Georgia statutes. TITLE 4 Animals
Article 2 Bovine Diseases

4-4-90.
Purpose of article.

The purpose of this article is to safeguard public health by controlling and, if practical, eradicating any and all diseases of cattle which are communicable to man.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 591, § 1.

4-4-91.
“Qualified veterinarians” defined.

The term “qualified veterinarians,” as used in this article, means veterinarians approved by the Commissioner and the secretary of agriculture of the United States to administer tuberculin tests to cattle intended for interstate shipment.

History.

Ga. L. 1927, p. 348, § 4; Code 1933, § 62-1104.

4-4-92.
Duty of Commissioner to eradicate tuberculosis; county appropriations; right of entry to test cattle; assistance by owners of cattle.

It shall be the duty of the Commissioner to eradicate tuberculosis in cattle. The Commissioner shall have full and complete authority and responsibility in all livestock sanitary control work.

To enable the Commissioner to eradicate bovine tuberculosis effectively and to aid him in establishing a modified accredited tuberculosis-free area, in conformity with the rules and regulations promulgated by the United States Animal Health Association and adopted by the secretary of agriculture, United States Department of Agriculture, the authority having charge of county affairs of any county in which the state and federal governments jointly engage in a tuberculosis eradication campaign may appropriate such sums as they may deem adequate and necessary to aid in this work. The Commissioner or his duly authorized agent is empowered to enter upon any premises, barn, lot, or any other place where cattle are kept, for the purpose of applying tests with tuberculin to ascertain whether or not the cattle so tested are affected with tuberculosis. The owners or keepers of such cattle shall render such reasonable assistance as may be required to enable the Commissioner or his agent to apply the test with accuracy and promptness.

History.

Ga. L. 1927, p. 348, § 1; Code 1933, § 62-1101.

4-4-93.
Notice to owners; testing; branding of infected cattle; slaughter.

If the Commissioner receives information or has reason to believe that tuberculosis exists in any cattle, he shall promptly notify the owner or owners and shall arrange to have such cattle tested by a qualified veterinarian.

All cattle which shall react to a tuberculin test shall immediately after such reaction be branded on the left jaw with the letter “T,” such letter to be not less than two inches in length; and in addition such reactors shall be tagged in the left ear with a special tag to be adopted by the Commissioner. All cattle so identified shall be slaughtered within a period of 14 days immediately following such reaction, such slaughter to be under the direction of the Commissioner in a slaughterhouse where federal or competent local meat inspection is maintained. The owners of such reactors to the tuberculin test shall be indemnified for such cattle, as provided for in this article.

History.

Ga. L. 1927, p. 348, § 2; Code 1933, § 62-1102.

4-4-94.
Indemnification of owners.

Before having such reacting cattle slaughtered, the Commissioner shall notify the owner of his findings as to the condition of the cattle. The owner shall be indemnified in an appropriate amount, to be determined by the Commissioner using the standards set forth in Code Section 4-4-72, from available funds.

History.

Ga. L. 1927, p. 348, § 3; Code 1933, § 62-1103.

4-4-95.
Use or sale of veterinary tuberculin.

No person, firm, or corporation shall administer veterinary tuberculin, except qualified veterinarians. No person, firm, or corporation shall sell, offer for sale or distribution, or keep on hand any veterinary tuberculin, except qualified veterinarians, licensed druggists, or others lawfully engaged in the sale of veterinary biological products.

History.

Ga. L. 1927, p. 348, § 4; Code 1933, § 62-1104.

Cross references.

Use of drugs of the sulfanilamide or sulfonamide group for use in control of livestock diseases, §

26-4-6

.

4-4-95.1.
Transport of cattle; segregation of cattle with brucellosis; removal or alteration of cattle identification; rules and regulations; sale of infected cattle.

As used in this Code section, the term:

“Cattle” or “cow” means bovine animals, such as cows, bulls, steers, heifers, and bison.

“Person” means any individual, partnership, corporation, association, or other entity.

It shall be unlawful for any person to transport or cause to be transported into the State of Georgia any cattle:

Unless each cow is accompanied by a health certificate containing such information and in such form as may be provided for by rules and regulations of the Commissioner or unless each such cow is listed on an accompanying waybill and is transported directly to a federally approved or state approved slaughtering establishment and is not allowed to come into contact with any other cattle in this state until its arrival at such establishment;

Which are infected with brucellosis, unless such cattle are transported directly to a federally approved or state approved slaughtering establishment and are not allowed to come into contact with any other cattle in this state until their arrival at such establishment or unless a permit has been issued by the Commissioner allowing the importation or movement of such cattle and all conditions of such permit are complied with by the person transporting such cattle; or

Which originate from a quarantined herd or a quarantined area, unless the Commissioner has issued a permit authorizing the importation or movement of such cattle and all conditions of such permit are complied with by the person transporting such cattle.

It shall be unlawful for any person to move any cattle within this state in violation of any quarantine order imposed by the Commissioner or to allow any cow which such person knows or, through the use of reasonable inquiry, should know is from a quarantined herd or area to come into contact with any other cattle, except as authorized by a permit issued by the Commissioner or as authorized in rules and regulations adopted by the Commissioner.

Any person violating subsection (b) or (c) of this Code section for the first time on or after July 1, 1985, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by a fine not to exceed $100.00 for each cow transported or moved in violation of subsection (b) or (c) of this Code section, or in lieu of prosecution such person may be issued a warning by the Commissioner.

Any person violating subsection (b) or (c) of this Code section for a second time on or after July 1, 1985, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor of a high and aggravated nature.

Any person violating subsection (b) or (c) of this Code section for a third or subsequent time on or after July 1, 1985, shall be guilty of a felony and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by a fine not to exceed $10,000.00 or imprisonment for not less than one year nor more than three years, or both.

Any person who owns or has custody or control over any cattle infected with brucellosis or which are known reactor animals to an official brucellosis test shall segregate such cattle in such manner that they cannot come into contact with other cattle or spread such brucellosis infection to other cattle. Any person who fails to take such action within 30 days following an order from the Commissioner to do so shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and each day of continued failure to comply with such order shall constitute a separate offense.

Any person who removes, defaces, alters, or otherwise changes any official permanent mark, brand, tattoo, tag, or other means of identification on any cow for which a health certificate or permit or official test has been issued or performed under this chapter or the rules and regulations of the Commissioner or which has a known brucellosis infection or is a known reactor animal to an official brucellosis test shall be guilty of a felony and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by a fine not to exceed $10,000.00 or by imprisonment for not less than one year nor more than three years, or both.

The Commissioner is authorized to adopt rules and regulations, issue orders and permits, and impose quarantines when such actions are authorized or required by federal or state law or are appropriate to prevent the introduction or spread of brucellosis into or within this state, any area thereof, or any cattle located therein.

Any person who knowingly sells any cow within this state which is infected with brucellosis or which such person knows or, through the use of reasonable inquiry, should know is from a quarantined herd or area and who sells such cow without disclosing such fact to the purchaser, prior to the consummation of the sale, shall be liable for all reasonable and foreseeable damages incurred by the purchaser as a proximate result of the purchaser mixing such cow with other cattle owned or under the control of the purchaser.

History.

Code 1981, §

4-4-95.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1985, p. 704, § 1.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1985, a misspelling of “accompanying” was corrected in paragraph (1) of subsection (b).

4-4-96.
Applicability of article to anthrax and brucellosis.

This article shall apply to the control and, if possible, the eradication of anthrax and brucellosis as well as to the eradication of bovine tuberculosis.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 591, § 1.

4-4-96.1.
Injunctions.

In addition to the remedies provided in this article and notwithstanding the existence of any adequate remedy at law, the Commissioner is authorized to apply to the superior court for an injunction. Such court shall have jurisdiction, upon hearing and for cause shown, to grant a temporary or permanent injunction, or both, restraining any person from violating or continuing to violate any of the provisions of this article or for failing or refusing to comply with the requirements of this article or any rule or regulation adopted by the Commissioner under this article. An injunction issued under this Code section shall not require a bond.

History.

Code 1981, §

4-4-96.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1991, p. 361, § 1.

4-4-97.
Penalty for violations of article.

Any person violating any provision of this article shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by a fine of not less than $25.00 for each offense.

History.

Ga. L. 1927, p. 348, § 6; Code 1933, § 62-9914.